New Jersey, session 222, S2780.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 42 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 42 Natural Resource Management CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $45,000,000 of the amounts on deposit in the Transportation Trust Fund Account  Subaccount for Capital Reserves, shall be appropriated to the Palisades Interstate Park Commission to support the development and construction of disaster recovery projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The Palisades Interstate Park Commission shall use the monies hereinabove appropriated in accordance with such conditions and requirements established in accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, the Executive Director of the Palisades Interstate Park Commission, and the heads of any other agencies that the Commissioner of Environmental Protection deems necessary.  The memorandum of understanding shall require, at minimum, that the Palisades Interstate Park Commission repay to the Department of the Treasury  the $45,000,000 hereinabove appropriated, regardless of whether the Palisades Interstate Park Commission receives any reimbursement, grant award, or other financial assistance from the federal government for the cost of any project funded from the monies hereinabove appropriated.  The schedule, terms, and conditions of repayment shall be established jointly by the Department of the Treasury and the Palisades Interstate Park Commission and set forth in the memorandum of understanding required by this act.  Any repayments received by the Department of the Treasury shall be deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund Account  Subaccount for Capital Reserves. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.